California, session 20252026, SB802.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Over the past 4.5 years, the State of California has given the City and County of Sacramento over $400,000,000 and Sacramento Steps Forward nearly $450,000,000 to address homelessness.(b)According to the State of California’s Accountability tool, the Sacramento area was awarded $173,300,000 from 2019 to 2025 in Homeless Housing, Assistance and Prevention funding alone.(c)(b) Despite these investments, Sacramento County’s population of chronically homeless individuals was the third highest in the nation in 2023, according to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).(d)(c) HUD’s assessment found that around 72 percent of the people experiencing homelessness in Sacramento County are unsheltered, the fifth-highest percentage in the nation.(d) The homelessness population of the County of Sacramento has increased 13 percent from 2024 to 2026, according to the most recent Point in Time Count.(e) On any given night, over 7,500 people experience homelessness in the County of Sacramento.(e)(f) Sacramento has also faced a steep rise in student homelessness, with a 19-percent increase from 2023 to 2024—far surpassing the state’s increase of 9 percent in student homelessness.(f)(g) To address these issues, the City and County of Sacramento themselves recommended a joint powers authority (JPA) in 2010.(g)(h) In September 2010, the Sacramento City Council passed a resolution to implement a JPA with a staff recommendation to create it by the end of the 2010–11 fiscal year. However, no JPA was formed.(h)(i) In November 2010, the Sacramento Steps Forward published a report highlighting its goal of forming a JPA by 2011. However, no JPA was formed.(i)(j) In December 2010, the City and County of Sacramento adopted a resolution to form a JPA. However, no JPA was formed.(j)(k) A Sacramento city manager’s report in March 2011 outlined a planned JPA timeline, including the JPA board being seated in March 2012. However, no JPA was formed.(k)(l) In November 2011, the County of Sacramento presented at a city council meeting, outlining the county’s roles and responsibilities, how it would collaborate with Sacramento Steps Forward, and why a JPA model should be implemented. However, no JPA was formed.(l)(m) In 2019, the Sacramento Grand Jury reported that a Sacramento JPA is vital and recommended the city and county reconsider a JPA. Still, no JPA was formed.(m)(n) In November 2022, frustrated Sacramento voters passed Measure O, the Emergency Shelter and Enforcement Act, which required the city and county to work together to expand services and address encampments.(n)(o) In December 2022, the City and County of Sacramento signed a binding contract to work together to address homelessness. The agreement established shared coordination, joint operational teams, shared planning, and collaboration on funding. However, no consolidation of resources and staffing has been established and no JPA was formed.(o)(p) Despite this agreement, in the 2022–23 Grand Jury Report, the Grand Jury again recommended that the county and the seven incorporated cities implement a JPA to address homelessness by December 1, 2023. Still, no JPA was formed.(p)(q) In 2023, the City of Sacramento was sued by the Sacramento District Attorney, alleging that the city failed to enforce its homelessness laws. The litigation remains unresolved.(q)(r) In 2023, Governor Newsom and Attorney General Bonta sued the City of Elk Grove for violating state fair housing laws, reaching a settlement that included requiring the city to identify and rezone a site for affordable housing and undergo state monitoring to ensure compliance with housing laws.(r)(s) A 2023 Grand Jury report cited that a lack of a regional authority is a major barrier to progress, noting that efforts are often duplicative, data systems are siloed, and strategic planning is inconsistent across jurisdictions. Again, no joint powers authority was formed.(t) Homelessness and housing affordability are regional challenges requiring coordinated action among local governments.(u) The County of Sacramento and the cities located in the county share responsibility for the planning, funding, and delivery of housing and homelessness services.(v) Improved coordination, accountability, and performance oversight are necessary to maximize the effectiveness of state and federal investments and improve outcomes for individuals experiencing homelessness.(w) Since the introduction of this act, significant progress has been made toward a more coordinated regional approach to homelessness and housing.(x) The County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the City of Elk Grove, the City of Rancho Cordova, the City of Citrus Heights, and the City of Folsom, Sacramento Steps Forward, the Sacramento City and County Continuum of Care, and other stakeholders have responded to this act.(y) The framework proposed by this act is now reflected in conversations between local jurisdictions.(z) While concepts and timelines have been proposed, no final governance agreement has been approved, and the path forward remains dependent on future negotiations amongst multiple jurisdictions and stakeholders.(aa) Therefore, this act remains an imperative legislative tool, key to the City of Sacramento’s accountability and coordination on the successful implementation of services related to housing and homelessness.SEC. 2.Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 6539.9.5) is added to Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read:1.5.Sacramento Area Housing and Homelessness Agency6539.9.5.For purposes of this article:(a)“Agency” means the Sacramento Area Housing and Homelessness Agency.(b)“Governing board” means the governing board of the agency.(c)(1)“Qualified local agency” means any city within the County of Sacramento that has a population of at least 50,000, based on the most recent federal decennial census or a subsequent estimate prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.(2)“Qualified local agency” includes, but is not limited to, the Cities of Citrus Heights, Elk Grove, Folsom, Rancho Cordova, and Sacramento.6539.9.7.(a)(1)Notwithstanding any other law, the joint powers authority currently operating as the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency, created pursuant to a 1973 agreement between the City of Sacramento and the County of Sacramento, shall be restructured, expanded, amended, and renamed as the Sacramento Area Housing and Homelessness Agency as provided in this article.(2)The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the restructuring of the agency described in paragraph (1) is to modernize and expand the agency’s scope and governance to address regional housing and homelessness needs, while preserving the agency’s legal status, contracts, funding eligibility, and programmatic history.(b)The agency shall include as participating jurisdictions the County of Sacramento and each qualified local agency, and shall operate under a new joint powers agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter.(c)The agency shall serve as the regional authority to do all of the following:(1)Develop and preserve affordable housing.(2)Coordinate and administer homelessness prevention and response services, including the Coordinated Entry System, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 50490 of the Health and Safety Code.(3)Apply for, receive, and administer federal, state, and local funding for housing and homelessness.(4)Manage and implement a comprehensive strategic plan to address and reduce homelessness in the County of Sacramento.(d)The updated joint powers agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide for all of the following:(1)(A)A governing board composed of elected officials from each qualified local agency that is party to the agreement, with full delegated powers and duties transferred from the cities and county. The initial board under the amended joint powers agreement shall consist of 11 members appointed by the legislative bodies of the County of Sacramento and each qualified local agency, in accordance with the following:(i)Three members shall be selected from, and appointed by, the city council of the City of Sacramento.(ii)Three members shall be selected from, and appointed by, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento.(iii)Two members shall be selected from, and appointed by, the city council of the City of Elk Grove.(iv)One member each shall be selected from, and appointed by, the city councils of the Cities of Citrus Heights, Folsom, and Rancho Cordova.(B)The board may increase the number of members if a qualified local agency enters into an agreement to join the joint powers agreement. That qualified local agency shall be entitled to make one appointment to the board.(C)Each member on the governing board may select an alternate to serve on the board when the primary member or members are not available. Each alternate shall be appointed to serve for a specific member and shall be an official elected from the same body as the primary member. The alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and shall have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the primary member. The legislative body of any voting entity appointing an alternate shall provide written notification to the secretary of the governing board of each appointment of an alternate in order for the appointment to be effective.(D)A member of the governing board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses approved by the board.(E)Each governing board member is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted for a vote.(F)If a vacancy occurs on the governing board because of death, resignation, illness, or for other reason, the secretary of the governing board shall immediately provide written notice to the qualified local agency appointing the board member of the need to appoint a replacement, and the replacement shall be appointed within 60 days of the transmittal of the notice. The replacement shall be an official elected from the same body as the primary member.(G)The governing board shall be established no later than January 1, 2028.(2)(A)An executive director of the agency. The initial executive director of the agency under the amended joint powers agreement shall be the current executive director of the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency.(B)The governing board shall establish a removal and replacement process for the executive director.(3)Bylaws, to be established by the governing board, which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(A)A regular meeting schedule for the governing board, in accordance with the following:(i)The schedule, location, time, and agenda of all regular and special governing board meetings shall be publicly noticed.(ii)All meetings shall be open to the public, unless the matter is a proper one for closed session. All meetings shall comply with the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5).(iii)The governing board shall meet no fewer than 10 times per year.(B)(i)A code of ethics, the key expectations of which shall include all of the following:(I)Act in the best interest of the agency.(II)Do not use official positions for private gain.(III)Abstain from decisions where personal or financial interests conflict with Agency interests.(ii)Each member of the governing board and each employee shall uphold high standards of integrity, fairness, and transparency.(iii)Each member of the governing board shall comply with the requirements of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000)), and shall file statements of economic interests, as required by law.(iv)The governing board shall establish process to address any ethics violations.(C)A reimbursement process, including designating what qualifies as a reimbursable expense and establishing procedure for making payments.(e)The agency shall adopt a comprehensive strategic plan to address housing and homelessness no later than three years from the date the restructured agreement takes effect. The plan shall align with all relevant state and federal requirements. The agency shall submit the plan to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795.6539.9.9.(a)The agency shall retain its legal identity as the public housing authority and redevelopment successor entity formerly known as the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency and shall continue to administer all existing housing, homelessness, and redevelopment programs in compliance with applicable law. An entity shall not be created that negates the duties of the agency.(b)(1)Except as specified in paragraph (2), agency shall assume or continue responsibility for the administration and oversight of programs for all participating entities in the joint powers agreement pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A)The Section 8 Housing Choice Voucher Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f; 24 C.F.R. 982).(B)The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f(o)(19)).(C)Public housing under Sections 1436d and 1437f of Title 42 of the United States Code.(D)(i)The Community Development Block Grant Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5301 et seq.).(ii)(I)Except as specified in subclauses (II) and (III), the agency shall continue to administer Community Development Block Grant funds, as those funds were administered by the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025.(II)A qualified local agency that is, as of July 1, 2025, collecting Community Development Block Grant funds and administering their own Community Development Block Grant Programs, shall maintain and retain responsibility for the administration and oversight of these programs, including, but not limited to, collection, allocation, and disbursement of all funds for Community Development Block Grant Programs.(III)A qualified local agency that did not have a representative on the governing board of the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025, and who is not collecting Community Development Block Grant funds and administering their own Community Development Block Grant Programs, may elect to do so.(E)(i)The HOME Investment Partnerships Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12721 et seq.).(ii)(I)Except as specified in subclauses (II), (III), and (IV), the agency shall continue to administer the City of Sacramento and County of Sacramento HOME Investment Partnerships Program, as it was administered by the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025.(II)A qualified local agency that is collecting HOME Investment Partnerships Program funds and administering their own HOME Investment Partnerships Programs, as of July 1, 2025, shall maintain and retain responsibility for the administration and oversight of these programs, including, without limitation, collections, allocation, and disbursement of all funds for such HOME Investment Partnerships Program.(III)A qualified local agency that did not have a representative on the governing board of the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025, that receives HOME Investment Partnerships Program funds through the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency, may elect to continue to receive those funds through the agency.(IV)A qualified local agency that did not have a representative on the governing board of the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025, and who is not collecting HOME Investment Partnerships Program funds and administering their own HOME Investment Partnerships Programs, may elect to do so.(F)The Emergency Solutions Grants (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11371 et seq.).(G)The Continuum of Care Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11381 et seq. and 24 C.F.R. 578).(H)The Housing Opportunities for Persons With AIDS Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12901 et seq.).(I)State homelessness programs, including the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50216) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code) and the Homekey program (Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code).(J)Coordinated Entry System, a HUD-mandated Continuum of Care, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 50490 of the Health and Safety Code.(2)Qualified local agencies shall maintain and retain responsibility for the administration and oversight of any new programs that may become available to local governments including, without limitation, collection, allocation, and disbursement of all funds.(c)The agency shall comply with all applicable regulations and requirements, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1)Sections 574, 576, 578, 960, 965, 982, and 990 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(2)With respect to public housing agency planning, Section 903 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3)Continuum of Care governance, data, and performance standards mandated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.(4)The Housing Authorities Law (Article 1 (commencing with Section 34200) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code).(5)Requirements under applicable state programs, including, but not limited to, the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50216) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code) and the Homekey program (Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code).(6)All applicable civil rights laws, including the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), including the mandate to affirmatively further fair housing; the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.); and Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d et seq.).(d)The agency shall maintain eligibility for all funding programs for which the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency or Sacramento Steps Forward previously qualified.(e)(1)Except as specified in paragraph (3), pursuant to agreements with the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of July 1, 2025, the agency shall be the designated recipient of all local housing trust funds and local housing ordinance fees collected by each participating entity within the joint powers agreement pursuant to Section 6539.9.7. These funds shall include, but are not limited to, the affordable housing ordinance fee collected by the County of Sacramento (Section 22.35.010 et seq. of the Sacramento County Code) and the mixed income housing ordinance fee collected by the City of Sacramento (Section 17.712.010 et seq. of the Sacramento City Code).(2)The funds and fees described in paragraph (1) shall only be spent within the jurisdiction from which they were originally collected and for the purposes for which they were originally collected.(3)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified local agency that collects any local housing trust funds or local housing ordinance fees as of July 1, 2025, shall maintain and retain responsibility for the administration and oversight of those local housing trust funds or local housing ordinance fees.(f)The agency shall be deemed a regional entity for the purposes of statewide housing and homelessness funding programs and shall be granted priority consideration for all applicable state housing and homelessness funding sources.6539.9.11.(a)The agency shall be the successor employer to the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency for all labor relations purposes, including, but not limited to:(1)Recognition of all employee organizations recognized as of the effective date of this act as the exclusive representative of the employees in an appropriate unit.(2)Enforcement of existing collective bargaining agreements.(3)Processing of pending grievances, arbitration proceedings, and unfair practice charges.(4)Compliance with all labor relations obligations and commitments.(b)The restructuring and renaming of the agency pursuant to this act shall not interrupt, impair, or diminish the representation rights of any employee organization or the collective bargaining rights of represented employees.(c)All collective bargaining agreements in effect between employee organizations and the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until their scheduled expiration dates.(d)The agency shall assume responsibility for and be bound by all pending grievances, arbitration proceedings, and other labor relations matters from the predecessor agencies.(e)Nothing in the establishment of the agency is intended to circumvent existing jurisdictional labor agreements, including project labor agreements or community workforce training agreements.6539.9.13.(a)There shall exist within the agency the Homelessness Division.(b)The Homelessness Division shall be comprised of both of the following:(1)Sacramento Steps Forward.(2)Participating members and experts from the Sacramento Continuum of Care, including those with lived experience of homelessness.6539.9.15.(a)The agency shall coordinate its operations with the housing and homelessness departments of each participating jurisdiction to ensure alignment of local priorities and effective delivery of services.(b)The departments described in subdivision (a) include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1)The Department of Homeless Services and Housing of the County of Sacramento.(2)The Department of Community Response of the City of Sacramento.(3)The Housing Division of the City of Elk Grove.(4)The Housing Division of the City of Rancho Cordova.(5)The Housing and Grants Division of the City of Citrus Heights.(6)The City of Folsom.(c)The agency may also consult with additional local departments, advisory bodies, or nonprofit partners as needed to fulfill its mission.6539.9.17.(a)The agency shall establish and maintain a standing advisory board to ensure compliance with federal and state requirements for public participation in housing authority and Continuum of Care governance.(b)The advisory board shall be appointed by a majority vote of the governing board. The advisory board shall adopt bylaws for appointments, terms, and procedures.(c)The advisory board shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1)At least one individual currently or formerly experiencing homelessness, pursuant to Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and at least one individual who is a current resident of public housing or low-income housing.(2)Representatives from community-based organizations, service providers, and housing developers.(3)Experts in behavioral health, public housing, and program implementation.(d)The advisory board shall do all of the following:(1)Meet at least quarterly in publicly noticed meetings.(2)Provide recommendations on funding, programs, planning, and performance.(3)Fulfill United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and state consultation requirements for funding and compliance.(4)Assist in development of the agency’s strategic plan and annual updates.(5)Ensure all state and federal requirements of board participation are met.(e)The advisory board shall not have voting authority over governing board decisions.(f)The advisory board shall consist of seven members, appointed as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).6539.9.19.The agency shall not acquire property by eminent domain.6539.9.21.The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 2. Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 6539.9.5) is added to Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: Article 1.5. Sacramento Regional Housing and Homelessness Joint Powers Authority Act6539.9.5. (a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Sacramento Regional Housing and Homelessness Joint Powers Authority Act.(b) The County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the City of Elk Grove, the City of Rancho Cordova, the City of Citrus Heights, and the City of Folsom shall participate in and work together to establish a joint powers authority, pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500)), designed to make a meaningful difference for people experiencing housing insecurity and homelessness across the County of Sacramento.(c) The County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the City of Elk Grove, the City of Rancho Cordova, the City of Citrus Heights, and the City of Folsom together shall do all of the following:(1) Bring elected officials from across the region together through the joint powers authority that provides program and policy guidance and establishes shared goals to improve the efficacy of the region’s homeless response system and affordable housing resources.(2) Bring the oversight and functions of the Sacramento City and County Continuum of Care under the jurisdiction of the joint powers authority, while maintaining the federally required composition and integrity of the continuum of care.(3) Work collaboratively with the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Authority to develop goals and action plans that address homelessness, affordable housing, and advance a true housing continuum regionally.(d) The joint powers authority shall do all of the following:(1) Set system performance goals and, at a minimum, regularly review state and federal performance metrics to address housing and homelessness.(2) Collaborate to update the regionally coordinated homelessness action plan as necessary and oversee implementation of the plan.(3) Coordinate on delivery of prevention, outreach, shelter, and housing programs, with local jurisdictions retaining oversight, accountability, and control over land use decisions and programs administered by the local jurisdictions.(4) Explore better integration with other systems working in homelessness and housing, including county-administered behavioral health, child and adult welfare, and social safety net services.(5) Align regional funding for housing and homelessness, with local jurisdictions retaining final control and approval over local, state, and federal funds eligible to be administered by local jurisdictions.(6) Comply with the requirements set forth in the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5).(7) Be designated as the federally recognized continuum of care.(8) Provide direction to the continuum of care lead agency.(9) Provide oversight over continuum of care functions, including all of the following:(A) The Homeless Management Information System.(B) The Coordinated Access System.(C) The Point-in-Time Count.(10) Develop a committee structure to ensure community voice continues to be incorporated.(11) Include the County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the City of Elk Grove, the City of Rancho Cordova, the City of Citrus Heights, and the City of Folsom.(12) Be developed as a formal, robust joint powers authority.(13) Have a board that consists solely of the elected officials representing the County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the City of Elk Grove, the City of Rancho Cordova, the City of Citrus Heights, and the City of Folsom.(14) Target both housing and homelessness.(15) Incorporate meaningful resources to provide services.(16) Have a governance structure that includes the lead entities, respectively, from both the Continuum of Care and the Sacramento Housing and Redevelopment Agency.(17) Hold monthly public meetings and incorporate public participation.(e) A local jurisdiction shall retain oversight and accountability over funding decisions, projects, and programs administered by the local jurisdiction, including contracting for prevention, outreach, sheltering, and housing.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares, with respect to Section 2 of this act, that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique and urgent housing and homelessness conditions in the County of Sacramento and its major cities.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.